Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licensing

§ 2821.
Repealed. 2011, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 45.

§ 2821a.
License for primary modalities; common requirements.

The Director shall recognize and follow the ARRT and the NMTCB primary certification process. The Director shall issue a license to practice in one of the following three primary modalities to any person who in addition to the other requirements of this section, has reached the age of majority and has completed preliminary education equivalent to at least four years of high school:

Radiography. The Director shall issue a radiography license to any person who, in addition to meeting the general requirements of this section:

has graduated from a radiologic technology training program offered by a school of radiologic technology approved by ARRT; and

has obtained primary certification in radiography from ARRT.

Nuclear medicine technology. The Director shall issue a nuclear medicine technology license to any person who, in addition to meeting the general requirements of this section:

has graduated from a nuclear medicine technology program offered by a school of nuclear medicine technology approved by ARRT or NMTCB; and

has obtained primary certification in nuclear medicine technology from ARRT or NMTCB.

Radiation therapy. The Director shall issue a radiation therapy license to any person who, in addition to meeting the general requirements of this section:

has graduated from a radiation therapy training program offered by a school of radiologic technology approved by ARRT; and

has obtained primary certification in radiation therapy from the ARRT.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 47; amended

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§ 2821b.
License for postprimary modalities.

The Director shall recognize and follow the ARRT and NMTCB postprimary certification process in the following postprimary practice categories: mammography, computed tomography (CT), cardiac-interventional radiography, vascular-interventional radiography, and positron emission tomography (PET).

In order for a licensee who has obtained one of the three primary ARRT or NMTCB certifications set forth in section 2821a of this subchapter to practice in one of the postprimary modalities set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the licensee must first obtain postprimary certification from ARRT or NMTCB for that category, except:

a person with a primary license in radiation therapy may perform CT for treatment simulation; and

a person with a primary license in nuclear medicine technology may perform CT for attenuation correction on hybrid imaging equipment, such as PET/CT and SPECT/CT scanners.

In order to practice bone densitometry or apply ionizing radiation using bone densitometry equipment, a primary certification and license in radiography is required, with the exception that individuals who perform quantitative computed tomography (QCT) bone densitometry must obtain postprimary certification in CT in addition to primary certification.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 48; amended

2017, No. 48

, § 20;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§§ 2822,
2823.
Repealed. 2019, No. 30, § 18.

§ 2824.
Repealed. 1999, No. 52, § 46.

§ 2825.
Repealed. 2011, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 50.

§ 2825a.
Licensure by endorsement.

The Director may grant a license to an applicant who possesses a license in good standing in another state and possesses the applicable ARRT or NMTCB primary and postprimary certifications as set forth in sections 2821a and 2821b of this subchapter, respectively.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 51; amended

2019, No. 30

, § 18.